Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-316 Effect of change in governing
law. (a) A security interest perfected pursuant to the law of the
jurisdiction designated in section 490:9-301(1) or 490:9-305(c) remains
perfected until the earliest of:

(1) The time perfection would have ceased under the
law of that jurisdiction;

(2) The expiration of four months after a change of
the debtor's location to another jurisdiction; or

(3) The expiration of one year after a transfer of
collateral to a person that thereby becomes a debtor and is located in another
jurisdiction.

(b) If a security interest described in
subsection (a) becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before
the earliest time or event described in that subsection, it remains perfected
thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under the law
of the other jurisdiction before the earliest time or event, it becomes
unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser
of the collateral for value.

(c) A possessory security interest in
collateral, other than goods covered by a certificate of title and as-extracted
collateral consisting of goods, remains continuously perfected if:

(1) The collateral is located in one jurisdiction and
subject to a security interest perfected under the law of that jurisdiction;

(2) Thereafter the collateral is brought into another
jurisdiction; and

(3) Upon entry into the other jurisdiction, the
security interest is perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(e), a security interest in goods covered by a certificate of title which is
perfected by any method under the law of another jurisdiction when the goods
become covered by a certificate of title from this State remains perfected until
the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of the other
jurisdiction had the goods not become so covered.

(e) A security interest described in
subsection (d) becomes unperfected as against a purchaser of the goods for
value and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the
goods for value if the applicable requirements for perfection under section
490:9-311(b) or 490:9-313 are not satisfied before the earlier of:

(1) The time the security interest would have become
unperfected under the law of the other jurisdiction had the goods not become
covered by a certificate of title from this State; or

(2) The expiration of four months after the goods had
become so covered.

(f) A security interest in deposit accounts,
letter-of-credit rights, or investment property which is perfected under the
law of the bank's jurisdiction, the issuer's jurisdiction, a nominated person's
jurisdiction, the securities intermediary's jurisdiction, or the commodity
intermediary's jurisdiction, as applicable, remains perfected until the earlier
of:

(1) The time the security interest would have become
unperfected under the law of that jurisdiction; or

(2) The expiration of four months after a change of
the applicable jurisdiction to another jurisdiction.

(g) If a security interest described in
subsection (f) becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before
the earlier of the time or the end of the period described in that subsection,
it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest does not become
perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of that
time or the end of that period, it becomes unperfected and is deemed never to
have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

(h) The following rules apply to collateral to
which a security interest attaches within four months after the debtor changes
its location to another jurisdiction:

(1) A financing statement filed before the change
pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction designated in section 490:9-301(1) or
490:9-305(c) is effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral if
the financing statement would have been effective to perfect a security
interest in the collateral had the debtor not changed its location; and

(2) If a security interest perfected by a financing
statement that is effective under paragraph (1) becomes perfected under the law
of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the time the financing
statement would have become ineffective under the law of the jurisdiction
designated in section 490:9-301(1) or 490:9-305(c) or the expiration of the
four-month period, it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest
does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the
earlier time or event, it becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been
perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

(i) If a financing statement naming an
original debtor is filed pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction designated in
section 490:9-301(1) or 490:9-305(c) and the new debtor is located in another
jurisdiction, the following rules apply:

(1) The financing statement is effective to perfect a
security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor before, and within
four months after, the new debtor becomes bound under section 490:9-203(d), if
the financing statement would have been effective to perfect a security
interest in the collateral had the collateral been acquired by the original
debtor; and

(2) A security interest perfected by the financing
statement and that becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction
before the earlier of the time the financing statement would have become
ineffective under the law of the jurisdiction designated in section
490:9-301(1) or 490:9-305(c) or the expiration of the four-month period remains
perfected thereafter. A security interest that is perfected by the financing
statement but that does not become perfected under the law of the other
jurisdiction before the earlier time or event becomes unperfected and is deemed
never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for
value. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 33, §6]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next